klingon-verb.lexc
! REFERENCES
! https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Klingon_grammar
! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=e5Did-eVQDc

Multichar_Symbols [NEG] [1P] [2P] [3P] [SG] [PL] [GUESSVERB] [OBJ-1P] [OBJ-2P] [OBJ-3P] [OBJ-SG] [OBJ-PL] [INDICATIVE] [IMPERATIVE] [REFLEXIVE] [RECIPROCAL] [REQUIRED] [WILLING] [PREPARED] [SET-UP] [AFRAID] [STATECHANGE] [RESUME] [CAUSATIVE] [UNDEFINED-SUBJ] [CAPABLE] [BEST] [CERTAIN] [UNCERTAIN] [OBVIOUS] [PERFECT] [PERFECTPURPOSE] [CONTINUOUS] [CONTINUOUSEND] [HONOR] [PERSON] [DEVERBNOUN] [INTEROGATIVE] [BEFORE] [SIMULTANEOUS] [AFTER] [CONDITIONAL] [CAUSE] [RELATIVE] [PURPOSE] [REFUSE] [EMPHASIS] [REVERSE] @U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@ @U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@ @D.VERBTYPE1.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE1.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE2.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE2.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE3.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE3.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE4.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE4.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE5.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE5.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE6.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE6.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE7.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE7.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE8.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE8.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE9.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE9.ON@ @P.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@ @R.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@ @C.INDICATIVE@ @D.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@ @P.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@ @R.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@

LEXICON Root
						VerbPrefix;


LEXICON VerbPrefix
@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@				VerbIndicativePrefix;
@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@				VerbImperativePrefix;


LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix
[1P][SG]:0					VerbIndicativePrefix1PSG;
[2P][SG]:0					VerbIndicativePrefix2PSG;
[3P][SG]:0					VerbIndicativePrefix3PSG;
[1P][PL]:0					VerbIndicativePrefix1PPL;
[2P][PL]:0					VerbIndicativePrefix2PPL;
[3P][PL]:0					VerbIndicativePrefix3PPL;
@P.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@			vIndicativePrefixUnspecified;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix1PSG
0:jI						Verb; ! No Object
![OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:qa				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:vI				Verb;
![OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:Sa				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:vI				Verb;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix2PSG
0:bI						Verb; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:cho				Verb;
![OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:Da				Verb;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:ju				Verb;
![OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:Da				Verb;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix3PSG
						Verb; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:mu				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:Du				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:nu				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:lI				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:0				Verb;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix1PPL
0:ma						Verb; ! No Object
![OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:pI				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:wI				Verb;
![OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:re				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:DI				Verb;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix2PPL
0:Su						Verb; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:tu				Verb;
![OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:bo				Verb;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:che				Verb;
![OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:bo				Verb;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix3PPL
						Verb; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:mu				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:nI				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:lu				Verb;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:nu				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:lI				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:0				Verb;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefixUnspecified
						Verb; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:vI				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:Da				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:0				Verb;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:wI				Verb;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:bo				Verb;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:lu				Verb;


LEXICON VerbImperativePrefix
[2P][SG]:yI					Verb;
[2P][SG][OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:HI			Verb;
[2P][SG][OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:yI			Verb;
[2P][SG][OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:gho			Verb;
[2P][SG][OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:tI			Verb;
[2P][PL]:pe					Verb;
[2P][PL][OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:HI			Verb;
[2P][PL][OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:yI			Verb;
[2P][PL][OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:gho			Verb;
[2P][PL][OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:tI			Verb;


LEXICON Verb
@U.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@				StativeVerb;
@U.VERBTYPE.ACTION@				ActionVerb;

LEXICON StativeVerb
tIn%[to-be-big%]:tIn				VerbSuffix;
Say'%[to-be-clean%]:Say'			VerbSuffix;
mIS%[to-be-confused%]:mIS			VerbSuffix;
puS%[to-be-few%]:puS				VerbSuffix;
QaQ%[to-be-good%]:QaQ				VerbSuffix;
Quch%[to-be-happy%]:Quch			VerbSuffix;
law'%[to-be-many%]:law'			VerbSuffix;
chuS%[to-be-noisy%]:chuS			VerbSuffix;
rur%[to-be-like%]:rur				VerbSuffix;
rap%[to-be-the-same%]:rap			VerbSuffix;
yIQ%[to-be-wet%]:yIQ				VerbSuffix;


LEXICON ActionVerb
poj%[to-analyze%]:poj				VerbSuffix;
tlha'%[to-chase%]:tlha'			VerbSuffix;
Sop%[to-eat%]:Sop				VerbSuffix;
tu'%[to-find%]:tu'				VerbSuffix;
nob%[to-give%]:nob				VerbSuffix;
qIp%[to-hit%]:qIp				VerbSuffix;
tul%[to-hope%]:tul				VerbSuffix;
Dub%[to-improve%]:Dub				VerbSuffix;
HoH%[to-kill%]:HoH				VerbSuffix;
laD%[to-read%]:laD				VerbSuffix;
'ang%[to-reveal%]:'ang				VerbSuffix;
legh%[to-see%]:legh				VerbSuffix;
ngev%[to-sell%]:ngev				VerbSuffix;
bom%[to-sing%]:bom				VerbSuffix;
ba'%[to-sit%]:ba'				VerbSuffix;
Qong%[to-sleep%]:Qong				VerbSuffix;
Qap%[to-succeed%]:Qap				VerbSuffix;
toj%[to-trick%]:toj				VerbSuffix;
yaj%[to-understand%]:yaj			VerbSuffix;
bej%[to-watch%]:bej				VerbSuffix;


LEXICON VerbSuffix
@U.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@				NounType5Suffix; ! Type-5 noun suffixes that would normally be attached to the noun are instead attached to the adjectival verb
						VerbRoversSuffix;


LEXICON VerbRoversSuffix
! "These suffixes have no defined position, and can go after the verb stem or after any suffix – even another rover – except after a type-9 suffix or where the result would be meaningless. They modify whatever directly precedes them."
[NEG]@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@:@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@be'			VerbRoversSuffix;
[NEG]@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@:@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@Qo'			VerbRoversSuffix;
[REFUSE]@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@:@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@Qo'			VerbRoversSuffix;
[EMPHASIS]:qu'								VerbRoversSuffix;
[REVERSE]:Ha'								VerbRoversSuffix;
									AllVerbTypeSuffixes;


LEXICON AllVerbTypeSuffixes
			VerbType1Gate;
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@			VerbType2Gate;
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@		VerbType3Gate;
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@		VerbType4Gate;
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@		VerbType5Gate;
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@		VerbType6Gate;
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@		VerbType7Gate;
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@@P.VERBTYPE7.ON@		VerbType8Gate;
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@@P.VERBTYPE7.ON@@P.VERBTYPE8.ON@		VerbType9Gate;
									VerbMoodTag;


LEXICON VerbMoodTag
[INDICATIVE]@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@@D.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@:@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@@D.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@			#;
[IMPERATIVE]@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@:@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@			#;


LEXICON VerbType1Gate
@D.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@			VerbType1Suffix;

LEXICON VerbType1Suffix ! 2 Count = reflexive/reciprocal
[REFLEXIVE]:'egh				VerbRoversSuffix;
[RECIPROCAL]:chuq				VerbRoversSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType2Gate
@D.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@			VerbType2Suffix;

LEXICON VerbType2Suffix ! 5 Count = volition/necessity
[REQUIRED]:nIS					VerbRoversSuffix;
[WILLING]:qang					VerbRoversSuffix;
[PREPARED]:rup					VerbRoversSuffix;
[SET-UP]:beH					VerbRoversSuffix;
[AFRAID]:vIp					VerbRoversSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType3Gate
@D.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@			VerbType3Suffix;

LEXICON VerbType3Suffix ! 2 Count = inceptive/inchoative
[STATECHANGE]:choH				VerbRoversSuffix;
[RESUME]:qa'					VerbRoversSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType4Gate
@D.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@			VerbType4Suffix;

LEXICON VerbType4Suffix ! 1 Count = causative
[CAUSATIVE]:moH					VerbRoversSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType5Gate
@D.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@			VerbType5Suffix;

LEXICON VerbType5Suffix ! 2 Count = undefined subject; capability
[UNDEFINED-SUBJ]@R.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@@C.INDICATIVE@:@R.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@@C.INDICATIVE@lu				VerbRoversSuffix;
[CAPABLE]:laH					VerbRoversSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType6Gate
@D.VERBTYPE6.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@			VerbType6Suffix;

LEXICON VerbType6Suffix ! 4 Count = perfection; uncertainty
[BEST]:chu'					VerbRoversSuffix;
[CERTAIN]:bej					VerbRoversSuffix;
[UNCERTAIN]:law'				VerbRoversSuffix;
[OBVIOUS]:ba'					VerbRoversSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType7Gate
@D.VERBTYPE7.ON@@P.VERBTYPE7.ON@			VerbType7Suffix;

LEXICON VerbType7Suffix ! 4 Count = aspect
[PERFECT]:pu'					VerbRoversSuffix;
[PERFECTPURPOSE]:ta'				VerbRoversSuffix;
[CONTINUOUS]@P.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@:@P.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@taH		VerbRoversSuffix;
[CONTINUOUSEND]:lI'				VerbRoversSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType8Gate
@D.VERBTYPE8.ON@@P.VERBTYPE8.ON@			VerbType8Suffix;

LEXICON VerbType8Suffix ! 1 Count = honorific
[HONOR]:neS					VerbRoversSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType9Gate
@D.VERBTYPE9.ON@@P.VERBTYPE9.ON@			VerbType9Suffix;

LEXICON VerbType9Suffix ! 11 Count = syntactic
[PERSON]:wI'					VerbMoodTag; ! Nominalizer
[DEVERBNOUN]:ghach				VerbMoodTag; ! Nominalizer
[INTEROGATIVE]:'a'				VerbMoodTag; ! Modal
[OPTATIVE]:jaj					VerbMoodTag; ! Modal
[BEFORE]:pa'					VerbMoodTag; ! Subordinator
[SIMULTANEOUS]@R.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@:vIS@R.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@				VerbMoodTag; ! Subordinator - It is always used in conjunction with the type-7 suffix continuous suffix -taH.
[AFTER]:DI'					VerbMoodTag; ! Subordinator
[CONDITIONAL]:chugh				VerbMoodTag; ! Cause and effect
[CAUSE]:mo'					VerbMoodTag; ! Cause and effect
[RELATIVE]:bogh					VerbMoodTag; ! Relative and purpose clause
[PURPOSE]:meH					VerbMoodTag; ! Relative and purpose clause
